Alaska statutes. Title 39. Public Officers and Employees.
Article 1. Administration.

Sec. 39.25.010.
Purpose of chapter.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish a system of personnel administration based upon the merit principle and adapted to the requirements of the state to the end that persons best qualified to perform the functions of the state will be employed, and that an effective career service will be encouraged, developed, and maintained.

The merit principle of employment includes the following:

recruiting, selecting, and advancing employees on the basis of their relative ability, knowledge, and skills, including open consideration of qualified applicants for initial appointment;

regular integrated salary programs based on the nature of the work performed;

retention of employees with permanent status on the basis of the adequacy of their performance, reasonable efforts of temporary duration for correction in inadequate performance, and separation for cause;

equal treatment of applicants and employees with regard only to consideration within the merit principles of employment; and

selection and retention of an employee’s position secure from political influences.

History.

(§ 1 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 1 ch 46 SLA 1980)

Sec. 39.25.020.
Appointing authorities.

The authority to appoint to positions in the state service is as follows:

the legislature is the appointing authority for all officers and employees of the legislature and the legislative agencies, but the authority to make appointments may be delegated;

the governor is the appointing authority for all officers and employees of the executive branch, but the authority to make appointments may be delegated;

the chief justice of the supreme court is the appointing authority for all administrative and clerical personnel of the state judicial system, but the authority to make appointments may be delegated;

the board of regents is the appointing authority for all employees of the University of Alaska, but the authority to make appointments may be delegated.

Unless a waiver is granted by the commissioner of administration, an appointing authority may not appoint a person to state service if the person has been convicted under AS

11.56.845

. Before granting a waiver under this subsection, the commissioner shall give notice in writing to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee of the intent to grant a waiver.

History.

(§ 8 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2005, in subsection (b), “AS

11.56.845

” was substituted for “AS

11.56.870

” to reflect the 2005 renumbering of AS

11.56.870

.

Sec. 39.25.030.
Division of personnel and board.

There is established within the Department of Administration a division of personnel.
There is established within the division of personnel a personnel board.

History.

(§ 9 ch 144 SLA 1960)

Sec. 39.25.040.
Director of personnel.

The head of the division of personnel is the director of personnel appointed by the commissioner of administration and responsible to the commissioner of administration for the execution of the duties and responsibilities imposed by this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter.
The director of personnel shall have at least three years of practical working experience in the field of personnel administration.

History.

(§ 10 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 3 ch 82 SLA 1975; am § 1 ch 112 SLA 1982)

Sec. 39.25.050.
Powers and duties of director.

The director of personnel shall direct and supervise the administrative and technical activities of the division of personnel. In addition to the other duties imposed on the director, the director shall

administer this chapter and the personnel rules;

encourage and exercise leadership in the development of effective personnel administration in the state government;

develop, in cooperation with appointing authorities and others, programs for the improvement of employee effectiveness and morale;

attend meetings of the personnel board and serve as secretary for the board;

establish and maintain a roster of employees subject to this chapter;

prepare the rules, not inconsistent with this chapter, that are required to implement and administer this chapter;

perform other lawful acts that the director considers necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

administer the equal employment opportunity program under AS 39.28.

The director of personnel may contract with municipalities, private organizations, and other persons to provide personnel research or personnel training services for them and charge a fee for doing so.

History.

(§ 14 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 53 ch 36 SLA 1990; am E.O. No. 104 § 3 (2003))

Administrative Code. —

For appointments, see 2 AAC 7, art. 5.

For personnel evaluation and training, see 2 AAC 7, art. 7.

Sec. 39.25.060.
Personnel board.

The personnel board is composed of three members appointed by the governor and confirmed by the legislature meeting in joint session. The term of office of a member is six years. A vacancy in an unexpired term shall be filled by appointment by the governor for the remainder of the term. The appointment is subject to confirmation in the same manner as a full-term appointment.

Members of the board may not be employees of the state. Not more than two members of the board may be members of the same political party.

A board member may be removed by the governor only for cause.

A member of the board may receive a per diem allowance and transportation expenses incurred in carrying out the member’s duties.

History.

(§ 11 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 1982; am § 105 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For per diem and travel expenses, see AS

39.20.180

.

Sec. 39.25.070.
Powers and duties of personnel board.

In addition to the other duties imposed by this chapter, the personnel board shall

approve or disapprove amendments to the personnel rules in accordance with AS

39.25.140

;

consider and act upon recommendations for the extension of the partially exempt service and the classified service as provided in AS

39.25.130

;

hear and determine appeals by employees in the classified service as provided in AS

39.25.170

;

establish its own rules of procedure; two members constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and two affirmative votes are required for final action on matters acted upon by the board;

elect a chair from its membership;

have the power to administer oaths, subpoena witnesses, and compel the production of books and papers pertinent to a hearing authorized by this chapter;

employ staff members, who shall be in the classified service;

carry out its powers and duties under AS 39.52.

History.

(§ 15 ch 144 SLA 1960; am §§ 3, 4 ch 112 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 87 SLA 1986; am § 66 ch 74 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For classification, see 2 AAC 7, art. 1.

For recruitment and examination, see 2 AAC 7, art. 2.

For appointments, see 2 AAC 7, art. 5.

For probationary periods, see 2 AAC 7, art. 6.

For personnel evaluation and training, see 2 AAC 7, art. 7.

For pay, see 2 AAC 7, art. 8.

For separation and demotion, see 2 AAC 7, art. 9.

For disputes: hearings and appeals, see 2 AAC 7, art. 10.

Sec. 39.25.080.
Personnel records confidential; exceptions.

State personnel records, including employment applications and examination and other assessment materials, are confidential and are not open to public inspection except as provided in this section.

The following information is available for public inspection, subject to reasonable regulations on the time and manner of inspection:

the names and position titles of all state employees;

the position held by a state employee;

prior positions held by a state employee;

whether a state employee is in the classified, partially exempt, or exempt service;

the dates of appointment and separation of a state employee;

the compensation authorized for a state employee; and

whether a state employee has been dismissed or disciplined for a violation of AS

39.25.160(l)

(interference or failure to cooperate with the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee).

A state employee has the right to examine the employee’s own personnel files and may authorize others to examine those files.

An applicant for state employment who appeals an examination score may review written examination questions relating to the examination unless the questions are to be used in future examinations.

In addition to any access to state personnel records authorized under (b) of this section, state personnel records shall promptly be made available to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

or the child support enforcement agency of another state. If the record is prepared or maintained in an electronic data base, it may be supplied by providing the requesting agency with access to the data base or a copy of the information in the data base and a statement certifying its contents. The agency receiving information under this subsection may use the information only for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 18 ch 144 SLA 1960; am § 5 ch 112 SLA 1982; am § 143 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 1 ch 111 SLA 2000; am § 4 ch 67 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in (e) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For recruitment and examination, see 2 AAC 7, art. 2.

For records, see 21 AAC 10, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

The delayed repeal of (e) of this section by § 148(c), ch. 87, SLA 1997, as amended by § 53, ch. 132, SLA 1998, which was to take effect July 1, 2001, was repealed by § 15, ch. 54, SLA 2001.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Insofar as the ombudsman has a legitimate governmental interest in access and he is not the “public,” the ombudsman may be allowed access to personnel files, but only upon his assurance that the contents of the files will not, under any circumstances except an order of a court of competent jurisdiction, become public in whole or in part. February 28, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.